Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 8
BONDS - TO PAY MATURED SPECIAL ASSESSMENT

30-35-801. Power to issue bonds - purpose.

Subject to the provisions of this part 8, any home rule county shall have power and authority to issue its negotiable coupon bonds for the purpose of paying any special assessment bonds or obligations which it has issued or may issue, together with interest thereon, when it appears that there is not, or will not be, sufficient money for the payment of the same at maturity in the particular fund out of which payment should be made.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1482, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-802. Question submitted.

No bonds shall be issued under this part 8 until the question of issuing the same has been submitted, at a regular election of a home rule county, to a vote of those persons qualified to vote on authorization of other bonded indebtedness and approved as required by section 30-35-201 (6).

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1483, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-803. Ordinance - taxes - interest - disposition.

The issuance of any bonds voted on in accordance with this part 8 shall be authorized by an ordinance, which shall be irrepealable until the bonds therein provided for shall have been fully paid or discharged, specifying the purpose to which the funds to be raised shall be applied and providing for the levy of a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest and extinguish the principal of such bonds within fifteen but not less than ten years from the creation thereof. Such tax, when collected, shall be applied only to the purpose specified in such ordinance until such bonds shall be paid or discharged. Such bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates and shall be exchanged or sold at a price or prices so that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized. Interest shall be paid semiannually and shall be payable at such place, be in such denominations, and be executed by such officers as may be prescribed in such ordinance. Such bonds may be exchanged for outstanding matured and overdue special assessment bonds or obligations and interest thereon or they may be sold and the proceeds thereof used for the purpose specified in this part 8.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1483, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-804. Construction - disposition of delinquent assessment.

Nothing in this part 8 shall be construed to release or discharge any special assessment which is now, or may become, a lien on or against any property. Any home rule county issuing bonds under this part 8 shall be subrogated to the rights of the holders or owners of the outstanding special assessment bonds or obligations paid. If, after the issuance of bonds authorized by this part 8, the delinquent or defaulted special assessments, or any part thereof, are collected and the special assessment bonds or obligations payable out of the particular special assessment fund have been redeemed by means of bonds issued under this part 8, the amounts so collected shall be used to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds authorized and the tax levies therefor shall be reduced in a like manner.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1483, § 1, effective June 8.